Massachusetts, session 194th, H3461.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 1I of chapter 164 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in line 9, the figure “2.5” and inserting in
place thereof the following figure:- “5”.
of 1